Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB888.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The legislative body of any city, county, consolidated local government, urban-
county government, charter county government, or unified local government
shall not have the authority to enter into any collective bargaining agreement on
or after the effective date of this Act.
(2) Collective bargaining agreements in existence as of the effective date of this Act
shall not be subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and any
entity subject to a collective bargaining agreement may negotiate future
agreements when the existing agreement ends.
Section 2. KRS 160.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be under the management and control of a board of
education consisting of five (5) members, except in counties containing a city of the
first class wherein a merger pursuant to KRS 160.041 shall have been accomplished
which shall have seven (7) members elected from the divisions and in the manner
prescribed by KRS 160.210(5), to be known as the "Board of Education of ....,
Kentucky." Each board of education shall be a body politic and corporate with
perpetual succession. It may sue and be sued; make contracts; expend funds
necessary for liability insurance premiums and for the defense of any civil action
brought against an individual board member in his official or individual capacity, or
both, on account of an act made in the scope and course of his performance of legal
duties as a board member; purchase, receive, hold, and sell property; issue its bonds
to build and construct improvements; and do all things necessary to accomplish the
purposes for which it is created. Each board of education shall elect a chairman and
vice chairman from its membership in a manner and for a term prescribed by the
Page 1 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
board not to exceed two (2) years.
(2) No board of education shall participate in any financing of school buildings, school
improvements, appurtenances thereto, or furnishing and equipment, including
education technology equipment without:
(a) First establishing the cost of the project in advance of financing, based on the
receipt of advertised, public, and competitive bids for such project, in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424; and
(b) Establishing the cost of financing in advance of the sale of any bonds,
certificates of participation in any leases, or other evidences of financial
commitments issued by or on behalf of such board. Any bonds, leases,
participations, or other financial arrangements shall not involve a final
commitment of the board until the purchaser or lender involved shall have
been determined by public advertising in accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
(3) No board of education shall make a mortgage, lien, or other encumbrance upon any
school building owned by the board, or transfer title to any such school building as
part of any financing arrangement, without the specific approval of the Department
of Education, and without the transaction being entered into pursuant to a detailed
plan or procedure specifically authorized by Kentucky statute.
(4) Without the approval of the Department of Education, no board may lease, as
lessee, a building or public facility that has been or is to be financed at the request
of the board or on its behalf through the issuance of bonds by another public body
or by a nonprofit corporation serving as an agency and instrumentality of the board,
or by a leasing corporation. Any lease, participation, or other financial arrangement
shall not involve a final commitment of the board unless and until the purchaser or
lender involved in same shall have been determined by public advertising in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424. No transaction shall be entered into by the
board except upon the basis of public advertising and competitive bidding in
Page 2 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
(5) (a) A board of education shall not enter into any collective bargaining
agreement on or after the effective date of this Act.
(b) Collective bargaining agreements in existence as of the effective date of this
Act shall not be subject to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection
and a board of education may negotiate future agreements when the
existing agreement ends.
(6) A school district may issue general obligation bonds in accordance with KRS
Chapter 66.
(7)[(6)] Rental payments due by a board under a lease approved by the Department of
Education in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, and debt service
payments under a general obligation bond issued in accordance with this section,
shall be due and payable not less than ten (10) days prior to the interest due date for
the bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued to finance the building or public
facility. If a board fails to make a rental payment when due under a lease or a debt
service payment when due for a general obligation bond issue, upon notification to
the Department of Education by the paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee for the
bonds not less than three (3) days prior to the interest due date, the Department of
Education shall withhold or intercept any funds then due the board to the extent of
the amount of the required payment on the bonds and remit the amount to the
paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee as appropriate. Thereafter, the Department
of Education shall resolve the matter with the board and adjust remittances to the
board to the extent of the amount paid by the Department of Education on the
board's behalf.
(8)[(7)] Bonds, notes, or leases negotiated to provide education technology shall not
be sold for longer than seven (7) years or the useful life of the equipment as
established by the state technology master plan, whichever is less.
Page 3 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(9)[(8)] Notwithstanding any requirements of public advertising, competitive bidding,
or approval by the Department of Education, or any administrative regulation
promulgated pursuant to KRS 156.160(1)(o), a local board may authorize the
transfer or sale of the district's real or personal property to another governmental or
quasi-governmental agency in exchange for money or a similar type of property that
equals or exceeds the fair market value of the district property as determined by an
independent appraisal conducted by:
(a) An individual or organization not affiliated with the district or its officers or
employees, using a generally accepted national or professional standard; or
(b) A district's officers or employees using a nationally published valuation of
property based on the most recent edition of the publication.
Section 3. KRS 15.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Citizen" means any individual who is not:
1. A member or supervisor within the law enforcement agency that
employs an officer; or
2. An elected or appointed official within the unit of government under
which the law enforcement agency that employs the officer is organized;
(b) "Complaint" means any statement by a citizen, whether written or verbal, that
alleges any type of misconduct by an officer, including statements that are
submitted or received anonymously;
(c) "Disciplinary action" means termination, demotion, a decrease in pay or
grade, suspension without pay, and a written reprimand;
(d) "General employment policies" means the rules, regulations, policies, and
procedures commonly applicable to the general workforce or civilian
employees that are not unique to law enforcement activities or the exercise of
peace officer authority, regardless of whether those rules, regulations,
Page 4 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
policies, and procedures exist or appear in a departmental manual or
handbook that is solely applicable to a law enforcement department or agency
within the unit of government employing the officer;
(e) "Interrogation" means a formal investigative interview and does not mean
conversations or meetings of supervisory personnel and subordinate officers
that are not intended to result in disciplinary action, such as conversations or
meetings held for the purpose of providing corrective instruction counseling
or coaching;
(f) "Law enforcement procedures" means only those policies, rules, and customs
that:
1. Are specific to the conduct of officers in the exercise of law
enforcement powers and functions, including, without limitation: use of
force, conduct in the course of pursuits, conduct during stops or
detentions of citizens, conduct in the course of interacting with,
assisting, or questioning of citizens, and investigative conduct;
2. Are carried out in the course of peace officer functions;
3. Are not general employment policies; and
4. May exist in either written form or in the form of unwritten standards,
practices, or protocols generally accepted and applied in the law
enforcement profession;
(g) "Misconduct" means any act or omission by an officer that violates criminal
law, law enforcement procedures, or the general employment policies of the
employing agency; and
(h) "Officer" means a person employed as a full-time peace officer by a unit of
government that receives funds under KRS 15.410 to 15.510, except a state
officer listed in KRS 15.420(2)(a)2.b. to f. and n., who has completed any
officially established initial probationary period of employment lasting no
Page 5 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
longer than twelve (12) months not including, unless otherwise specified by
the employing agency, any time the officer was employed and completing the
basic training required by KRS 15.404.
(2) In order to establish a minimum system of professional conduct for officers of local
units of government of this Commonwealth, the following standards are stated as
the intention of the General Assembly to deal fairly and establish administrative due
process rights in certain disciplinary matters concerning those officers of an
employing unit of government that participates in the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Foundation Program fund administered pursuant to KRS 15.430 and, at the same
time, to provide a means for redress by the citizens of the Commonwealth for
wrongs allegedly done to them by officers covered by this section.
(3) Any complaint taken from a citizen alleging misconduct on the part of any officer
shall be taken as follows:
(a) If the complaint alleges criminal activity by an officer, the allegations may be
investigated without a signed, sworn complaint of the citizen;
(b) If the complaint alleges any other type of violation not constituting criminal
activity, including violations of law enforcement procedures or the general
employment policies of the employing agency, an affidavit, signed and sworn
to by the citizen, shall be obtained, except as provided by paragraph (c) of this
subsection; or
(c) If a complaint is required to be obtained and the citizen, upon request, refuses
to make allegations under oath in the form of an affidavit, signed and sworn
to, the employing agency may investigate the allegations, but shall bring
charges under subsection (6) of this section against the officer only if the
employing agency can independently substantiate the allegations absent the
sworn statement of the citizen.
(4) (a) When an officer is accused of an act or omission that would constitute a
Page 6 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
violation of law enforcement procedures by any individual within the law
enforcement agency employing the officer, including supervisors and elected
or appointed officials of the officer's employing agency, the employing
agency shall conform the conduct of any investigation to the provisions of
subsection (5) of this section, shall formally charge the officer in accordance
with subsection (6) of this section, and shall conduct a hearing in accordance
with subsection (7) of this section before any disciplinary action shall be taken
against the officer.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not prevent the employing agency from
suspending the officer, with or without pay, during an investigation and
pending the final disposition of any formal charges, except that an officer
suspended without pay shall be entitled to full back pay and benefits for the
regular hours he or she would have worked if no formal charges are brought
or the hearing authority finds the officer not guilty of the charges.
(c) An employing agency shall not be required to follow the provisions of this
section in addressing conduct by the officer that would constitute a violation
of the general employment policies of the employing agency.
(5) (a) Any complaint filed by a citizen under subsection (3) of this section or any
allegation of conduct that would constitute a violation of law enforcement
procedures under subsection (4) of this section shall be investigated by the
employing agency or another designated law enforcement agency in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection if the employing agency
determines that an investigation of the complaint or the alleged conduct is
warranted.
(b) No threats, promises, or coercions shall be used at any time against any
officer while he or she is a suspect in a criminal case or has been accused of a
violation of law enforcement procedures. Suspension from duty with or
Page 7 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
without pay, or reassignment to other than an officer's regular duties during
the period shall not be deemed coercion. Prior to or within twenty-four (24)
hours after suspending the officer pending investigation or disposition of a
complaint, the officer shall be advised in writing of the reasons for the
suspension.
(c) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the officer, no police officer shall be
subjected to interrogation for alleged conduct that violates law enforcement
procedures, until forty-eight (48) hours have expired from the time the request
for interrogation is made to the accused officer, in writing. The notice of
interrogation shall include a statement regarding any reason for the
interrogation and shall be served on the officer by certified mail, return receipt
requested, or by personal delivery.
(d) The interrogation shall be conducted while the officer is on duty. The officer
may be required to submit a written report of the alleged incident if the
request is made by the employing agency no later than the end of the subject
officer's next tour of duty after the tour of duty during which the employing
agency initially was made aware of the complaint.
(e) If an officer is under arrest, or likely to be arrested, or a suspect in any
criminal investigation, he or she shall be afforded the same constitutional due
process rights that are accorded to any civilian, including, but not limited to,
the right to remain silent and the right to counsel, and shall be notified of
those rights before any questioning commences.
(6) (a) If it is determined through investigation or other means that the facts alleged
in a citizen complaint or in an accusation of a violation of law enforcement
procedures warrant charging the officer, the charge shall be made in writing
with sufficient specificity so as to fully inform the officer of the nature and
circumstances of the alleged violation in order that he or she may be able to
Page 8 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
properly defend himself or herself.
(b) The charge shall be signed by a representative of the employing agency, shall
set out the disciplinary action recommended or imposed, and shall be served
on the officer in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by
personal delivery.
(c) When an officer has been charged with a violation of law enforcement
procedures, no public statements shall be made concerning the alleged
violation by any person or persons of the employing agency or the officer so
charged, until final disposition of the charges.
(d) No officer as a condition of continued employment by the employing agency
shall be compelled to speak or testify or be questioned by any person or body
of a nongovernmental nature.
(7) Unless waived by the charged officer in writing, a hearing shall be conducted by the
officer's appointing authority to determine whether there is substantial evidence to
prove the charges and to determine what, if any, disciplinary action shall be taken if
substantial evidence does exist. In conducting a hearing, the following
administrative due process rights shall be recognized and these shall be the
minimum rights afforded any officer charged, except as otherwise agreed to in
writing by the officer and the employing agency:
(a) The accused officer shall be given at least twelve (12) days' written notice of
any hearing. The notice of hearing shall be served on the officer by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery;
(b) Copies of any sworn statements or affidavits to be considered by the hearing
authority and any exculpatory statements or affidavits shall be furnished to the
officer no less than twelve days (12) prior to the time of any hearing;
(c) At any hearing based upon the sworn complaint of a citizen, the citizen shall
be notified to appear at the time and place of the hearing by certified mail,
Page 9 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
return receipt requested, or by personal delivery;
(d) If the return receipt has been returned unsigned, or the individual does not
appear, except due to circumstances beyond his or her control he or she
cannot appear at the time and place of the hearing, any charge resulting from a
complaint made by that citizen shall not be considered by the hearing
authority and shall be dismissed with prejudice;
(e) The accused officer shall have the right and opportunity to obtain and have
counsel present, and to be represented by counsel;
(f) The appointing authority, legislative body, or other body as designated by the
Kentucky Revised Statutes shall subpoena and require the attendance of
witnesses and the production by them of books, papers, records, and other
documentary evidence at the request of the accused officer or the charging
party. If any person fails or refuses to appear under the subpoena, or to testify,
or to attend, or produce the books, papers, records, or other documentary
evidence lawfully required, the appointing authority, legislative body, or other
body as designated by the Kentucky Revised Statutes may report to the
Circuit Court or any judge thereof the failure or refusal, and apply for a rule.
The Circuit Court, or any judge thereof, may on the application compel
obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the
requirements of a subpoena issued from the court;
(g) The accused officer shall be allowed to present witnesses and any
documentary or other relevant evidence the officer wishes to provide to the
hearing authority, and may cross-examine all witnesses called by the charging
party;
(h) If any officer who has been suspended with or without pay is not given a
hearing as provided by this section within seventy-five (75) days of any
charge being filed pursuant to this section, the charge shall be dismissed with
Page 10 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
prejudice and shall not be considered by any hearing authority and the officer
shall be reinstated with full back pay and benefits;
(i) Any officer who has been suspended without pay who is found not guilty of
the charges by the hearing authority shall be reinstated with the full back pay
and benefits for the regular hours he or she would have worked;
(j) The failure to provide any of the rights or to follow the provisions of this
section may be raised by the officer with the hearing authority. The hearing
authority shall not exclude proffered evidence based on failure to follow the
requirements of this section but shall consider whether, because of the failure,
the proffered evidence lacks weight or credibility and whether the officer has
been materially prejudiced; and
(k) To the extent the provisions of KRS 61.805 to 61.850 are applicable, the
hearing authority may conduct the hearing required by this subsection in a
closed session, unless the officer requests of the hearing authority in writing at
least three (3) days prior to the hearing that the hearing be open to the public.
(8) (a) Any officer who is found guilty by any hearing authority of any charge, may
bring an action in the Circuit Court in the county in which the employing
agency is located within thirty (30) days of the date written findings are issued
to appeal the action of the hearing authority. The appeal shall be initiated by
the filing of a complaint in the same manner as any civil action under the
Rules of Civil Procedure and shall include a copy of the hearing authority's
final order. The Circuit Court review of the case shall be based solely upon
the administrative record created before the hearing authority and any new
evidence offered by the officer regarding alleged arbitrariness on the part of
the hearing authority.
(b) The judgment of the Circuit Court shall be subject to appeal to the Court of
Appeals. The procedure as to appeal to the Court of Appeals shall be the same
Page 11 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
as in any civil action.
(9) The provisions of KRS 90.310 to 90.410, 95.450, and 95.765 shall not apply in any
proposed disciplinary action arising from a citizen complaint made under
subsection (3) of this section or arising from any allegation of conduct that would
constitute a violation of law enforcement procedures under subsection (4) of this
section. This section shall not be interpreted or construed to alter or impair any of
the substantive rights provided to a city police officer under KRS 90.310 to 90.410,
95.450, and 95.765 for any proposed disciplinary action or other matters not arising
under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, including proposed actions involving
alleged violations of general employment policies. To the extent that the provisions
of this section are inapplicable to any proposed disciplinary action against a city
police officer, the provisions of KRS 90.310 to 90.410, 95.450, and 95.765 shall
remain in full force and effect.
(10) As the provisions of this section relate to a minimum system of professional
conduct, nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to:
(a) Limit or to in any way affect any rights previously afforded to officers of the
Commonwealth by statute[, collective bargaining or working agreement,] or
legally adopted ordinance;
(b) Preclude an employing agency from investigating and charging an officer
both criminally and administratively;
(c) Prevent the suspension with or without pay or reassignment of an officer
during an investigation and pending final disposition charges;
(d) Permit an employing agency to categorize and treat any complaint that
originates from a citizen as an internal matter in order to avoid application of
all of the provisions of this section to the final disposition of a citizen's
complaint;
(e) Apply any disciplinary action required by this section to actions taken by an
Page 12 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
employing agency that is not related to misconduct by a law enforcement
officer, such as personnel decisions made by the employing agency due to a
lack of resources or personnel decisions related to a chief's management of a
police department; or
(f) Prevent an employing agency from electing to apply the provisions of this
section, or parts thereof, in circumstances that would not be covered under
this section.
(11) This section shall not apply to officers employed by a consolidated local
government that receives funds under KRS 15.410 to 15.510, who shall instead be
governed by the provisions of KRS 67C.326.
Section 4. KRS 61.598 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "bona fide promotion or career advancement":
(a) Means:
1. A professional advancement in substantially the same line of work held
by the employee in the four (4) years immediately prior to the final five
(5) fiscal years preceding retirement or a change in employment position
based on the training, skills, education, or expertise of the employee that
imposes a significant change in job duties and responsibilities to clearly
justify the increased compensation to the member; or
2. An increase in creditable compensation for all employees in a specified
class due to an increase in rate of pay authorized or funded by the
legislative or administrative body of the employer or due to an increase
in rate of pay [mandated in a collective bargaining agreement ]approved
by the legislative body of the employer; and
(b) Does not include any circumstance where an elected official participating in
the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the County Employees
Retirement System takes a position of employment with a different employer
Page 13 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
participating in any of the state-administered retirement systems.
(2) (a) For employees retiring from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the
County Employees Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System
on or after January 1, 2018, the systems shall, for each of the retiring
employee's last five (5) fiscal years of employment, identify any fiscal year in
which the creditable compensation increased at a rate of ten percent (10%) or
more annually over the immediately preceding fiscal year's creditable
compensation. The employee's creditable compensation in the fiscal year
immediately prior to the employee's last five (5) fiscal years of employment
shall be utilized to compare the initial fiscal year in the five (5) fiscal year
period.
(b) Except as limited or excluded by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any
amount of increase in creditable compensation for a fiscal year identified
under paragraph (a) of this subsection that exceeds ten percent (10%) more
than the employee's creditable compensation from the immediately preceding
fiscal year shall not be included in the creditable compensation used to
calculate the retiring employee's monthly retirement allowance. If the
creditable compensation for a specific fiscal year identified under paragraph
(a) of this subsection as exceeding the ten percent (10%) increase limitation is
not used to calculate the retiring employee's monthly retirement allowance,
then no reduction in creditable compensation shall occur for that fiscal year.
(c) If the creditable compensation of the retiring employee is reduced as provided
by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the retirement systems:
1. Shall refund the employee contributions and interest attributable to the
reduction in creditable compensation; and
2. Shall not refund the employer contributions paid but shall utilize those
funds to pay down the unfunded liability of the pension fund in which
Page 14 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
the retiring employee participated.
(3) (a) In order to ensure the prospective application of the limitations on increases in
creditable compensation contained in subsection (2) of this section, only the
creditable compensation earned by the retiring employee on or after July 1,
2017, shall be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section.
Creditable compensation earned by the retiring employee prior to July 1,
2017, shall not be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) If the reductions in creditable compensation during a retiring member's entire
last five (5) years of employment results in a reduction in his or her monthly
retirement allowance of less than twenty-five dollars ($25) per month or an
actuarially equivalent value under the various payment options, then no
reduction in creditable compensation or retirement allowances shall occur
under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) A bona fide promotion or career advancement as defined by subsection (1) of
this section;
(b) A lump-sum payment for compensatory time paid to an employee upon
termination of employment;
(c) A lump-sum payment made pursuant to an alternate sick leave program under
KRS 78.616(5) that is paid to an employee upon termination of employment;
(d) Increases in creditable compensation in a fiscal year over the immediately
preceding fiscal year, where in the immediately preceding fiscal year the
employer reported the employee as being on leave without pay for any reason,
including but not limited to sick leave without pay, maternity leave, leave
authorized under the Family Medical Leave Act, and any period of time
where the employee received workers' compensation benefit payments that
were not reported to the plan as creditable compensation;
Page 15 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(e) Increases in creditable compensation directly attributable to an employee's
receipt of compensation for:
1. Overtime hours worked while serving as a participating employee under
any state or federal grant, grant pass-through, or similar program that
requires overtime as a condition or necessity of the employer's receipt of
the grant; or
2. The first one hundred (100) hours of mandatory overtime hours that the
employee is individually required to work by the employer during a
fiscal year. This subparagraph shall not be construed to apply to
overtime hours voluntarily worked by the employee or in situations in
which the employee has the option to elect out of participation in
overtime hours. Any mandatory overtime hours exempt under this
subparagraph shall be in addition to any overtime hours otherwise
exempt under the provisions of this subsection; and
(f) Increases in creditable compensation directly attributable to an employee's
receipt of compensation for overtime performed during and as a result of a
state of emergency declared by:
1. The President of the United States or the Governor of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky; or
2. A local government in which the Governor authorizes mobilization of
the Kentucky National Guard pursuant to KRS 38.030 and 39A.950
during such time as the National Guard is mobilized.
(5) (a) For employees retiring on or after January 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2017,
the last participating employer shall be required to pay for any additional
actuarial costs resulting from annual increases in an employee's creditable
compensation greater than ten percent (10%) over the employee's last five (5)
fiscal years of employment that are not the direct result of a bona fide
Page 16 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
promotion or career advancement. The cost shall be determined by the
retirement systems.
(b) Lump-sum payments for compensatory time paid to an employee upon
termination of employment shall be exempt from this subsection.
(c) The Authority shall be required to answer inquiries from participating
employers regarding this subsection. Upon request of the employer prior to
the employee's change of position or hiring, the systems shall make a
determination that is binding to the systems as to whether or not a change of
position or hiring constitutes a bona fide promotion or career advancement.
(d) For any additional actuarial costs charged to the employer under this
subsection, the systems shall allow the employer to pay the costs without
interest over a period of one (1) year from the date of receipt of the employer's
final invoice.
(6) The Authority shall determine whether increases in creditable compensation during
the last five (5) fiscal years of employment prior to retirement constitute a bona fide
promotion or career advancement and may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section. All state-
administered retirement systems shall cooperate to implement this section.
(7) Any employer who disagrees with a determination made by the system in
accordance with this section regarding whether an increase in compensation
constitutes a bona fide promotion or career advancement for purposes of subsection
(5) of this section may request a hearing and appeal the decision in accordance with
KRS 61.645(16) or 78.782(16).
(8) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, and subsequent years, the Kentucky
Retirement Systems and the County Employees Retirement System shall provide a
means for employers to separately report the specific exceptions provided in
subsection (4) of this section within the reporting system utilized by the employers
Page 17 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
for making employer reports under KRS 16.645, 61.675, and 78.545. The Kentucky
Retirement Systems and the County Employees Retirement System shall
continually provide communication, instructions, training, and educational
opportunities for employers regarding how to appropriately report exemptions
established by subsection (4) of this section.
(9) This section shall not apply to employees participating in the hybrid cash balance
plan as provided by KRS 16.583, 61.597, 78.5512, and 78.5516.
Section 5. KRS 61.810 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All meetings of a quorum of the members of any public agency at which any public
business is discussed or at which any action is taken by the agency, shall be public
meetings, open to the public at all times, except for the following:
(a) Deliberations for decisions of the Kentucky Parole Board;
(b) Deliberations on the future acquisition or sale of real property by a public
agency, but only when publicity would be likely to affect the value of a
specific piece of property to be acquired for public use or sold by a public
agency;
(c) Discussions of proposed or pending litigation against or on behalf of the
public agency;
(d) Grand and petit jury sessions;
(e) [Collective bargaining negotiations between public employers and their
employees or their representatives;
(f) ]Discussions or hearings which might lead to the appointment, discipline, or
dismissal of an individual employee, member, or student without restricting
that employee's, member's, or student's right to a public hearing if requested.
This exception shall not be interpreted to permit discussion of general
personnel matters in secret;
(f)[(g)] Discussions between a public agency and a representative of a business
Page 18 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
entity and discussions concerning a specific proposal, if open discussions
would jeopardize the siting, retention, expansion, or upgrading of the
business;
(g)[(h)] State and local cabinet meetings and executive cabinet meetings;
(h)[(i)] Committees of the General Assembly other than standing committees;
(i)[(j)] Deliberations of judicial or quasi-judicial bodies regarding individual
adjudications or appointments, at which neither the person involved, his
representatives, nor any other individual not a member of the agency's
governing body or staff is present, but not including any meetings of planning
commissions, zoning commissions, or boards of adjustment;
(j)[(k)] Meetings which federal or state law specifically require to be conducted
in privacy;
(k)[(l)] Meetings which the Constitution provides shall be held in secret;
(l)[(m)] That portion of a meeting devoted to a discussion of a specific public
record exempted from disclosure under KRS 61.878(1)(m). However, that
portion of any public agency meeting shall not be closed to a member of the
Kentucky General Assembly; and
(m)[(n)] Meetings of any selection committee, evaluation committee, or other
similar group established under KRS Chapter 45A or 56 or other state or local
law, to select a successful bidder for award of a state or local contract.
(2) Any series of less than quorum meetings, where the members attending one (1) or
more of the meetings collectively constitute at least a quorum of the members of the
public agency and where the meetings are held for the purpose of avoiding the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, shall be subject to the requirements
of subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
prohibit discussions between individual members where the purpose of the
discussions is to educate the members on specific issues.
Page 19 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
Section 6. KRS 67.830 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court in any county, except in a county containing a consolidated local
government, a city of the first class, an urban-county government, or a unified local
government, and a majority of all cities within the county may adopt an ordinance
to study the question of merging the county government with all other units of local
government within the county to form a charter county form of government, or
consolidating any agency, subdivision, department, or subdistrict providing any
services or performing any functions for a city or county.
(2) In lieu of the adoption of an ordinance pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a
petition may be filed with the county clerk pursuant to KRS 67.832 requesting the
appointment of a commission to study the question of the adoption of a charter
county form of government or the consolidation of any agency, subdivision,
department, or subdistrict providing any services or performing any functions for a
city or county. The petition shall be signed by a number of registered voters equal
to at least twenty percent (20%) of the residents in the unincorporated area of the
county voting in the preceding regular election and twenty percent (20%) of the
residents in incorporated areas of the county voting in the preceding regular
election.
(3) Within sixty (60) days of the adoption of an ordinance pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section, or within sixty (60) days of a petition being filed with the county clerk
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and certified as sufficient pursuant to KRS
67.832, the fiscal court and the city legislative body of each city within the county
shall jointly appoint a commission to study the question of the adoption of a charter
county form of government or the consolidation of any agency, subdivision,
department, or subdistrict providing any services or performing any functions for a
city or county. The fiscal court shall determine the size of the membership of the
commission, which shall be composed of not less than twenty (20) or more than
Page 20 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
forty (40) citizen members, and which may include elected or appointed county and
city officials. Any officials appointed under this section shall serve as voting
members of the commission. The actual appointment of individual members to the
commission shall be governed by the following provisions:
(a) The county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, shall make a
number of appointments equal to fifty-five percent (55%) of the membership
of the commission;
(b) Jointly, the cities shall make a number of appointments equal to forty-five
percent (45%) of the membership of the commission. The mayor of each city
shall, subject to the approval of the city legislative body, make a number of
appointments based on the ratio that the percentage of the population residing
in the mayor's city bears to the total population of all cities in the county.
Each city within the county shall have a minimum of one (1) representative on
the commission; and
(c) The county judge/executive shall serve as a voting member of the commission
and preside as its chairman.
(4) The commission shall be funded by the fiscal court and each city within the county
in proportion to its ratio of membership on the commission and shall be responsible
for developing a comprehensive plan for the consolidation of services and functions
of cities and the county, or the formation of a charter county government that shall
include but not be limited to the following provisions:
(a) A description of the form, structure, functions, powers, and name of the
proposed charter county government;
(b) A description of the officers and their powers and duties of the proposed
charter county government;
(c) The procedures by which the original comprehensive plan may be amended
by the subsequently created charter county government;
Page 21 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(d) The procedures by which the comprehensive plan may be amended by county
and participating city or cities as a result of contingencies arising from the
failure of certain jurisdictions to vote in favor of joining the comprehensive
plan. The contingency plan shall be adopted by the participating county and
city or cities by joint ordinance. The contingency plan shall be adopted by the
participating county and city or cities within sixty (60) days of the
certification of the election result. The contingency plan shall only address:
1. Issues of revenue;
2. Issues of indebtedness;
3. Issues of service provision, service areas, or service area boundaries;
4. Personnel or administration[, but may not infringe upon any pre-existing
collective bargaining agreements in force in participating jurisdictions];
and
5. Any issues directly related to the cost of government or provision of
services within the comprehensive plan.
The contingency plan shall not address issues within the plan related to
paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection; and
(e) The procedures whereby the charter county government may be dissolved.
The procedures drafted shall include but are not limited to:
1. Requirements for a public petition for the dissolution of the charter
county government;
2. The question to be presented to voters for the dissolution of the charter
county government; and
3. Any administrative measures necessary to settle tax and debt issues
created by the dissolution of the charter county government.
The proposed charter plan shall specify that no petition for the dissolution of
the charter county government shall be valid until a period of five (5) years
Page 22 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
have passed from commencement of the first terms of the duly elected officers
of the charter county government.
(5) The comprehensive plan shall be completed within four (4) years of the
commission's appointment. If a majority of the commission members are unable to
agree on a single plan for the formation of a charter county government or the
consolidation of services or functions within four (4) years of the appointment of
the commission, the commission shall be disbanded unless two-thirds (2/3) of the
commission agree to extend the commission for no longer than six (6) months.
(6) The comprehensive plan shall be consistent with the provisions of the Constitution
of Kentucky and shall be advertised at least ninety (90) days before a regular
election at which the voters will be asked to approve or disapprove the adoption of
the comprehensive plan. The question of whether the comprehensive plan shall be
adopted shall be filed with the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in
August preceding the day of the next regular election.
(7) The comprehensive plan proposed shall be presented to the voters at a regular
election and:
(a) The votes shall be counted, returns made and canvassed in accordance with
the provisions of KRS Chapters 116 to 121 governing elections;
(b) The results shall be certified by the county board of election commissioners to
the county clerk; and
(c) If a majority of those voting on the issue within each area as required by
subsections (8) and (9) of this section are in favor of adopting the
comprehensive plan, the county board of election commissioners shall enter
the fact of record, and the charter county commission shall organize the
charter county government or the county and each participating city shall
provide for the consolidation of services or functions as provided in the
comprehensive plan.
Page 23 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(8) Subject to the restrictions in subsection (9) of this section, for the comprehensive
plan to be adopted, it shall require both a majority of those residents voting within
the unincorporated area of the county to vote in favor of its adoption, and:
(a) A majority of those residents voting within the city containing the largest
population in the county, based on the most recent decennial census, to vote in
favor of its adoption; or
(b) A majority of those residents voting, pursuant to subsection (9) of this section,
within cities that together contain at least fifty percent (50%) of the population
residing within the incorporated areas of the county, based on the most recent
decennial census, to vote in favor of its adoption.
(9) (a) The votes shall be counted within each city to determine whether the majority
of voters within each city are in favor of the adoption of the comprehensive
plan.
(b) Each city where the majority of those voting are in favor of adopting the
comprehensive plan shall participate in the charter county government,
subject to the requirements of subsection (8) of this section.
(c) Each city where the majority of those voting are not in favor of adopting the
comprehensive plan:
1. Shall not participate in the charter county government;
2. Shall remain incorporated unless dissolved in accordance with KRS
81.094 and shall continue to exercise all powers and perform the
functions permitted by the Constitution and general laws of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky applicable to the cities of the class to
which they have been assigned; and
3. Shall allow eligible voters within the city to vote for the chief executive
officer of the charter county government and the relevant legislative
body member or members of the charter county government for the area
Page 24 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
including the nonparticipating city.
(10) If the comprehensive plan is not adopted, the same proposal shall not be submitted
for voter consideration for a period of five (5) years from the date of the election
wherein the comprehensive plan failed to receive the requisite votes.
Section 7. KRS 67.852 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All contracts, bonds, franchises, and other obligations of a participating city and the
county in existence on the effective date of a charter county government[, including
but not limited to collective bargaining agreements,] shall continue in force and
effect as obligations of the charter county government for the term of those
contracts, bonds, franchises, and other obligations.
(2) The charter county government shall succeed to all rights and entitlements of these
contracts, bonds, franchises, and other obligations.
(3) All conflicts in the provisions of the contracts, bonds, franchises, and other
obligations shall be resolved in a manner that does not impair the rights of any of
the parties.[
(4) Nothing in KRS 67.825 to 67.875 shall be construed to nullify a participating city's
petition pursuant to KRS 345.010 to be included under KRS Chapter 345 for
collective bargaining with firefighters. Nothing in KRS 67.825 to 67.875 shall be
construed to nullify any other legal obligations requiring the continuance of
collective bargaining with a county's or participating city's employees. To the extent
required by KRS Chapter 345 or any other legal obligation requiring the
continuance of collective bargaining, the charter county government shall continue
to bargain collectively with those employees who were covered under a contract
with the county or participating city at the time of the formation of the charter
county government.]
Section 8. KRS 67.910 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The unification review commission shall study matters relating to the feasibility of
Page 25 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
forming a unified local government and, if unification is proposed, develop a
unification plan consistent with the provisions of the Kentucky Constitution and
KRS 67.900 to 67.940. A unification plan shall include:
(a) The process for establishing the unified local government;
(b) A description of the form, structure, functions, and powers of the proposed
unified local government;
(c) A description of the officers of the proposed unified local government and
their powers and duties;
(d) A procedure for the orderly and timely transition of specified services,
functions, and responsibilities from each affected city and the county to the
unified local government;
(e) A procedure for the orderly transition to the unified local government of the
services, functions, and responsibilities of any special district that will be
eliminated;
(f) A procedure for the orderly transition to the unified local government of the
services, functions, and responsibilities of any board, commission, or
authority that will be eliminated;
(g) The procedures by which the unification plan may be amended by the
subsequently created unified local government;
(h) The procedures by which the unification plan may be amended by the
participating county and city or cities as a result of contingencies arising from
the failure of certain jurisdictions to vote in favor of joining the unification
plan. The contingency plan shall be adopted by the participating county and
city or cities by joint ordinance. The contingency plan shall be adopted by the
participating county and city or cities within sixty (60) days of the
certification of the election result. The contingency plan shall only address:
1. Issues of revenue;
Page 26 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
2. Issues of indebtedness;
3. Issues of service provision, service areas, or service area boundaries;
4. Personnel or administration[, but may not infringe upon any pre-existing
collective bargaining agreements in force in participating jurisdictions];
and
5. Any issues directly related to the cost of government or provision of
services within the unification plan.
The contingency plan shall not address issues within the plan related to
paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g) of this subsection; and
(i) The procedures by which the unified local government may be dissolved. The
procedures drafted shall include but are not limited to:
1. Requirements for a public petition for the dissolution of the unified local
government;
2. The question to be presented to voters for the dissolution of the unified
local government; and
3. Any administrative measures necessary to settle tax and debt issues
created by the dissolution of the unified local government.
The proposed unification plan shall specify that no petition for the dissolution
of the unified local government shall be valid until a period of five (5) years
has passed from commencement of the first terms of the duly elected officers
of the unified local government; and
(j) Such other provisions as the commission shall determine.
(2) The unification review commission may propose a unification plan under which the
county and one (1) or more participating cities unite to form a single unit of local
government.
(3) The unification plan shall be completed within two (2) years of the commission's
appointment. If a majority of the commission members are unable to agree on a
Page 27 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
plan for unification within the two (2) year period, the unification review
commission shall be dissolved by operation of law.
Section 9. KRS 67C.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governmental and corporate functions vested in any city of the first class shall,
upon approval by the voters of the county at a regular or special election, be
consolidated with the governmental and corporate functions of the county
containing the city. This single government replaces and supersedes the
governments of the pre-existing city of the first class and its county.
(2) (a) A consolidated local government shall have all powers and privileges that
cities of the first class and their counties are, or may hereafter be, authorized
to exercise under the Constitution and the general laws of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky, including but not limited to those powers granted to cities of the
first class and their counties under their respective home rule powers.
(b) A consolidated local government shall continue to exercise these powers and
privileges notwithstanding repeal or amendment of any of the laws upon
which the powers and privileges are based unless expressly repealed or
amended for consolidated local governments.
(c) In addition, a consolidated local government shall have other powers and
privileges as the government may be authorized to exercise under the
Constitution and general laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(d) A consolidated local government is neither a city government nor a county
government as those forms of government exist on July 15, 2002, but it is a
separate classification of government which possess the greater powers
conferred upon, and is subject to the lesser restrictions applicable to, county
government and cities of the first class under the Constitution and general
laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(e) A consolidated local government shall be accorded the same sovereign
Page 28 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
immunity granted counties, their agencies, officers, and employees.
(3) A consolidated local government shall have power and authority to:
(a) Levy and collect taxes upon all property taxable for state purposes within the
territorial limits of the consolidated local government not exempt by law from
taxation;
(b) License, tax, and regulate privileges, occupations, trades, and professions
authorized by law, to be uniform throughout the jurisdiction;
(c) Make appropriations for the support of the consolidated local government and
provide for the payment of all debts and expenses of the consolidated local
government and the debts and expenses of the county and city of which it is
the successor;
(d) Issue or cause to be issued bonds and other debt instruments that counties
containing a city of the first class are authorized to issue or enter into all other
financial transactions as may be permitted by law;
(e) Purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or otherwise acquire, hold, use, and
operate any property, real or personal, for any public purpose, and sell, lease,
or otherwise dispose of any property, real or personal, belonging to a
consolidated local government;
(f) Exercise the power of eminent domain for any public purpose subject to the
limitations and exceptions prescribed by the Constitution and the general laws
of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(g) Accept federal or state funds and other sources of revenue that are applicable
to counties and cities of the first class;
(h) Establish, erect, maintain, and operate facilities for the confinement,
detention, and rehabilitation of persons convicted of the violation of the
ordinances and laws of a consolidated local government or the
Commonwealth of Kentucky;
Page 29 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(i) Pass and enforce by fines and penalties, if necessary, all ordinances, not
inconsistent with law, as are expedient in maintaining the peace, good
government, health, and welfare of the inhabitants of the county and prevent,
abate, and remove nuisances;
(j) Collect and dispose of garbage, junk, and other refuse, and regulate the
collection and disposal of garbage, junk, and other refuse by others;
(k) Provide for the redevelopment, renewal, or rehabilitation of blighted,
deteriorated, or dilapidated areas;
(l) Enforce zoning regulations;
(m) Enter into contracts and agreements with other governmental entities and with
private persons, firms, and corporations; and
(n) [Adopt procedures for collective bargaining with its employees and for the
certification of exclusive bargaining agents for groups of employees in
accordance with the Constitution and general laws of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky and its ordinances; and
(o) ]Exercise all other powers and authorities granted to counties and cities of the
first class by the general laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(4) The powers of the consolidated local government shall be construed broadly in
favor of the consolidated local government. The specific mention, or failure to
mention, of particular powers in this section shall not be construed as limiting in
any way the general or specific powers of a consolidated local government.
(5) A consolidated local government shall have power and jurisdiction throughout the
total area embraced by the official jurisdictional boundaries of the county.
(6) A consolidated local government shall be known as............../.....................County
Metro Government, which shall be the combination of the names of the largest city
in existence on the date of the adoption of the consolidated local government and
the county.
Page 30 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
Section 10. KRS 67C.326 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Citizen" means any individual who is not:
1. A member or supervisor within the law enforcement agency that
employs an officer; or
2. An elected or appointed official within the unit of government under
which the law enforcement agency that employs the officer is organized;
(b) "Complaint" means any statement by a citizen, whether written or verbal, that
alleges any type of misconduct by an officer, including any statement that is
submitted or received anonymously;
(c) "Disciplinary action" means termination, demotion, a decrease in pay or
grade, suspension without pay, or a written reprimand;
(d) "Interrogation" means a formal investigative interview and does not mean
conversations or meetings of supervisory personnel and subordinate officers
that are not intended to result in disciplinary action, such as conversations or
meetings held for the purpose of providing corrective instruction, counseling,
or coaching; and
(e) "Misconduct" means any act or omission by that officer that violates criminal
law or the rules and administrative regulations of the department or
consolidated local government.
(2) In order to establish a minimum system of professional conduct for the police
officers of consolidated local governments of this Commonwealth, the following
standards are stated as the intention of the General Assembly to deal fairly and
establish administrative due process rights for police officers of the consolidated
local government and, at the same time, provide a means for redress by the citizens
of the Commonwealth for wrongs allegedly done to them by police officers covered
by this section.
Page 31 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(3) Any complaint taken from a citizen alleging misconduct on the part of any police
officer, as defined herein, shall be taken as follows:
(a) If the complaint alleges criminal activity by a police officer, the allegations
may be investigated without a signed, sworn complaint of the citizen;
(b) If the complaint alleges any other type of misconduct, an affidavit, signed and
sworn to by the citizen, shall be obtained, except as provided by paragraph (c)
of this subsection; or
(c) If a complaint is required to be obtained and the citizen, upon request, refuses
to make allegations under oath in the form of an affidavit, signed and sworn
to, the department may investigate the allegations, but shall bring charges
under subsection (6) of this section against the police officer only if the
department can independently substantiate the allegations absent the sworn
statement of the citizen.
(4) (a) When an officer is accused of misconduct by any individual within the
department employing the police officer, including supervisors and elected or
appointed officials of the police officer's department, or by a citizen
complaint, the department shall conduct any investigation subject to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section, formally charge the police officer
in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, and conduct a hearing in
accordance with subsection (7) of this section before any disciplinary action is
taken against the police officer.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not prevent the department from
suspending the police officer, with or without pay, during an investigation and
pending the final disposition of any formal charges, except that a police
officer suspended without pay shall be entitled to full back pay and benefits
for the regular hours the officer would have worked if no formal charges were
brought or the board finds the officer not guilty of the charges.
Page 32 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(5) (a) Any complaint filed by a citizen under subsection (3) of this section or any
allegation of misconduct under subsection (4) of this section shall be
investigated by the department or another designated law enforcement agency
if the department determines that an investigation of the complaint or the
alleged misconduct is warranted.
(b) No threats, promises, or coercions shall be used at any time against any police
officer while he or she is a suspect in a criminal or departmental matter.
Suspension from duty with or without pay, or reassignment to other than an
officer's regular duties during the period, shall not be deemed coercion. Prior
to or within twenty-four (24) hours after suspending the officer pending
investigation or disposition of a complaint, the officer shall be advised in
writing of the reasons for the suspension.
(c) No police officer shall be subjected to interrogation in a departmental matter
involving alleged misconduct on his or her part, until forty-eight (48) hours
have expired from the time the request for interrogation is made to the
accused officer, in writing. The interrogation shall be conducted while the
officer is on duty. The notice of interrogation shall include a statement of any
reason for the interrogation and served on the officer by certified mail, return
receipt requested, or by personal delivery.
(d) If requested by the department no later than the end of the subject officer's
next tour of duty after the tour of duty during which the department initially
was made aware of the allegations of misconduct, the officer shall submit a
written report of the alleged incident.
(e) If a police officer is under arrest, or likely to be arrested, or a suspect in any
criminal investigation, he or she shall be afforded the same constitutional due
process rights that are accorded to any civilian, including but not limited to
the right to remain silent and the right to counsel, and shall be notified of
Page 33 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
those rights before any questioning commences.
(6) (a) If it is determined through investigation or other means that the facts alleged
in a citizen complaint or other allegation of misconduct warrant disciplining
the officer, the department shall provide the officer the written statement
required in KRS 67C.321(1)(a), which shall include sufficient specificity so as
to fully inform the police officer of the nature and circumstances of the
alleged violation in order that he or she may be able to properly defend
himself or herself.
(b) The written statement shall be signed by the chief, set out the disciplinary
action intended by the chief, and be served on the police officer in writing by
certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery.
(c) When a police officer has been charged with misconduct, no public statements
shall be made concerning the alleged violation by any person or persons of the
consolidated local government or the police officer so charged, until final
disposition of the charges.
(d) No police officer as a condition of continued employment by the consolidated
local government shall be compelled to speak or testify or be questioned by
any person or body of a nongovernmental nature.
(7) Subject to KRS 67C.321 and 67C.325, a hearing shall be conducted by the board to
determine whether the discipline issued by the chief is supported by a
preponderance of the evidence and whether the disciplinary action recommended by
the chief is justified. In conducting a hearing, the following administrative due
process rights shall be recognized and these shall be the minimum rights afforded
any police officer charged, except as otherwise agreed to in writing by the officer
and the employing agency:
(a) The accused police officer shall have been given at least twelve (12) days'
written notice of any hearing. The notice shall be served on the officer by
Page 34 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery;
(b) Copies of any sworn statements or affidavits to be considered by the board
and any exculpatory statements or affidavits shall be furnished to the police
officer no less than twelve (12) days prior to the time of any hearing;
(c) At any hearing based upon the sworn complaint of a citizen, the citizen shall
be notified to appear at the time and place of the hearing by certified mail,
return receipt requested, or by personal delivery;
(d) If the return receipt has been returned unsigned, or the citizen does not appear,
except where due to circumstances beyond his or her control he or she cannot
appear at the time and place of the hearing, any charge resulting from a
complaint made by that citizen shall not be considered by the hearing
authority and shall be dismissed with prejudice;
(e) The accused police officer shall have the right and opportunity to obtain and
have counsel present, and to be represented by the counsel;
(f) The board shall subpoena and require the attendance of witnesses and the
production by them of books, papers, records, and other documentary
evidence at the request of the accused police officer or the chief. If any person
fails or refuses to appear under the subpoena, or to testify, or to attend, or
produce the books, papers, records, or other documentary evidence lawfully
required, the board may report to the Circuit Court or any judge thereof the
failure or refusal, and apply for a rule. The Circuit Court, or any judge thereof,
may on the application compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in
the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from the
court;
(g) The accused police officer shall be allowed to present witnesses and any
documentary or other relevant evidence the police officer wishes to provide to
the board, and may cross-examine all witnesses called by the charging party;
Page 35 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(h) For any police officer suspended with or without pay who is not given a
hearing as provided by this section within sixty (60) days his or her appeal of
the final opinion by the chief or the chief's designee, the discipline and
charges issued by the chief shall be dismissed with prejudice, shall not be
considered by the board, and the officer shall be reinstated with full back pay
and benefits;
(i) Any police officer who has been suspended without pay who is found not
guilty of the charges by the board shall be reinstated with the full back pay
and benefits for the regular hours he or she would have worked;
(j) The failure to provide any of the rights or to follow the provisions of this
section may be raised by the officer with the hearing authority. The hearing
authority shall not exclude proffered evidence based on failure to follow the
requirements of this section but shall consider whether, because of the failure,
the proffered evidence lacks weight or credibility and whether the officer has
been materially prejudiced; and
(k) To the extent the provisions of KRS 61.805 to 61.850 are applicable, the
board may conduct the hearing required by this subsection in a closed session
unless the police officer requests of the board, in writing at least three (3) days
prior to the hearing, that the hearing be open to the public.
(8) As the provisions of this section relate to a minimum system of professional
conduct, nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to:
(a) Limit or in any way affect any rights previously afforded to a police officer of
the consolidated local government by statute[, collective bargaining or
working agreement,] or legally adopted ordinance;
(b) Preclude a consolidated local government from investigating and charging a
police officer both criminally and administratively; or
(c) Prevent the suspension, with or without pay or reassignment, of a police
Page 36 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
officer during an investigation and pending the final disposition of charges.
Section 11. KRS 78.425 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All police officers of whatever rank and title, and all employees[, except civilian
employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement,] of every county police
force affected by KRS 78.400 to 78.460 and 78.990 are covered by the provisions
hereof, except probationary officers and employees. All covered officers and
employees of every county police force on active duty or service as of the effective
date of an order of the fiscal court of the county creating a county police merit
system and board, shall be deemed fit and qualified to continue their respective
duties of employment on or for their respective county police force without
examination or further qualification, except and unless the chief of police of any
county police force shall, within sixty (60) days after the establishment of the
board, certify to the board that any officer or employee is physically unfit to
continue his or her duties.
(2) If a merit system is established which covers a county fire department, the
provisions of subsection (1) shall apply to the county fire department as they apply
to the county police force.
(3) All personnel covered by the provisions (a) of KRS 78.400 to 78.460, or (b) KRS
67.323, 67.325 and this section, or both, except probationary officers and
employees, shall be deemed to be permanent employees subject to their ability to
satisfactorily perform their respective duties and further subject to their good
behavior.
(4) Probationary officers and employees shall not be included in the merit system until
they satisfactorily complete their initial probationary periods established by the
governing merit board. Officers and employees serving promotional probationary
periods, however, shall not be deemed excluded from the merit system during the
promotional probationary periods.
Page 37 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
Section 12. KRS 95.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The city legislative body in cities of the first class may enact ordinances providing
for a system of pensions for retired and disabled members of the police and fire
divisions of the department of public safety and their dependents, may appropriate
funds for the purpose of paying such pensions, may allot and pay to the policemen's
pension fund or the firefighters' pension fund or either or both of them, all fines and
forfeitures imposed upon members of the respective divisions, and may provide for,
assess, and collect contributions from the members for the benefit of the fund.
(2) (a) There shall be a governing body of the policemen's pension fund, and a
governing body of the firefighters' pension fund. The governing bodies of the
respective funds shall hold title to all assets in their respective funds, and shall
have exclusive authority relating to investment of the assets of the funds,
including contracting with investment advisors or managers to perform
investment services as deemed necessary and prudent by the board. A
majority of the governing body of each fund shall be composed of persons
receiving pension benefits from the respective pension systems, and no more
than one (1) member of the city legislative body may be a member of the
governing body of either the policemen's or the firefighters' pension fund,
except if there are fewer than six (6) active and retired members of the
policemen's or the firefighters' pension fund, the governing body of the
pension fund shall be composed of the mayor, city treasurer or chief financial
officer, and two (2) employees appointed by the mayor from the city's
respective police department or fire department. To be effective, an action of
the governing body of a fund shall require only a simple majority of the votes
cast at a properly convened meeting of the governing body where a quorum is
present, with a quorum being a majority of the members of a governing body.
(b) If there are fewer than twelve (12) active and retired members or beneficiaries
Page 38 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
of the policemen's or the firefighters' pension fund, the governing body of the
fund may elect to offer to individuals entitled to benefits from the fund a one
(1) time irrevocable option to convert monthly pension benefits from the fund
to monthly annuity benefits from an insurance company for the same amount.
An insurance company accepting a benefit transfer shall honor any features
and options available under the existing plan. If the governing body of the
fund elects to offer the option to convert monthly pension benefits to monthly
annuity benefits, it shall provide to individuals entitled to benefits from the
fund sufficiently complete and appropriate disclosures to assist in making an
informed decision.
(c) If all liabilities to all individuals entitled to benefits from the policemen's
pension fund or firefighters' pension fund have been satisfied, the ordinances
establishing the fund may be repealed by the majority vote of the duly elected
members of the entire legislative body. If repealed, the governing body of the
policemen's or firefighters' pension fund shall, within sixty (60) days of
repeal, proceed with the liquidation of any residual assets of the fund. All
residual assets liquidated pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed by the
governing body to the city's general fund provided the return of assets
complies with federal and state law governing the distribution of assets.
Within thirty (30) days following the distribution of residual assets, the
governing body of the fund shall as its last act file a complete report with the
legislative body of the city, for retention by the city clerk the same as for other
city records, of the actions taken to dissolve the fund and liquidate residual
assets of the fund.
(3) Any policemen's pension fund or any firefighters' pension fund established under
the provisions of this section shall be held or distributed for, and only for, any of the
following purposes of the respective fund as applicable:
Page 39 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(a) Paying pensions, and any bonus payments under applicable ordinances;
(b) Making payments to the city for transfer to the County Employees Retirement
System for alternate participation pursuant to KRS 78.530(3)(a) and 78.531(2)
or for the distribution of residual assets in the event the fund is dissolved
pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section;
(c) Making payments to the city for transfer to an insurance company for
conversion of monthly pension benefits to monthly annuity benefits as
provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(d) Transferring pension assets through investment contract or other financial
instrument for the purpose of amortizing unfunded service liabilities; and
(e) Payment from the city to the County Employees Retirement System for future
pension contributions required pursuant to KRS 61.702 and 78.635.
Pursuant to the terms of this section, if policemen of the city of the first class elect
entry into the County Employees Retirement System and thereby create excess
funds over those required to provide for the purposes set forth in paragraphs (a), (b),
(c), (d), and (e) of this subsection, these excess funds shall be distributed to the city
for use by the city for any other purpose it may elect, including but not limited to
the establishment of a reserve for payment under paragraph (e) of this subsection.
The governing board of the fund may annually expend for the necessary expenses
connected with the fund, including but not limited to expenses for medical,
actuarial, accounting, and legal services, the amount such governing board deems
proper.
(f) Payment from the city to the County Employees Retirement System for future
pension contributions required pursuant to KRS 61.702 and 78.635. Pursuant
to the terms of this section, if firefighters of the city of the first class elect
entry into the County Employees Retirement System and thereby create
excess funds over those required to provide for the purposes set forth in
Page 40 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection, these excess funds shall
be distributed according to the terms of an agreement negotiated between the
city and the union organization representing the firefighters. The city may use
its share of the distributed excess funds for any purpose it may elect, including
but not limited to the establishment of a reserve for payment under paragraph
(f) of this subsection.
(4) (a) The governing body of each pension fund shall ensure that all of the assets in
the fund are distributed for the purposes in subsection (3) of this section, and
only for these purposes. If in any calendar year the assets in either fund
exceed those needed for the actuarial liability for payment of pension benefits
and any anticipated liabilities under subsection (3)(b) and (d) of this section,
the legislative body of the city establishing the pension system shall ensure by
pension bonus ordinance that a portion of these excess funds be distributed in
an equitable manner to all eligible pension recipients. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to require any change to be made to any pension
ordinance as it exists on July 15, 1998.
(b) The governing board of either fund may annually expend for the necessary
expenses connected with the fund, including but not limited to expenses for
medical, actuarial, accounting, and legal or other professional services, the
amount such governing board deems proper.
(5) Any ordinance establishing a pension fund under this section shall make equitable
provision for the rights of persons having an interest in assets transferred to the fund
from any fund heretofore established by statute.
(6) To assure equal protection for the beneficiaries of either fund, any action taken by
the city executive or legislative body in cities of the first class that affects a
policemen's pension fund or a firefighters' pension fund established under this
section shall, to the maximum extent permitted by law, treat each fund in a uniform
Page 41 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
manner and shall not cause any change to be made to the structure or operation of
either fund, whether through legislation, litigation, compromise, settlement, or
otherwise, unless any proposed change is offered to the other fund before it takes
effect. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any change to be
made to any pension ordinance as it exists on July 15, 1998.
(7) The legislative body in a city of the first class shall issue the appropriate order,
pursuant to KRS 78.530(1), directing participation for policemen in the County
Employees Retirement System. All new employees who would have been granted
membership in the local policemen's pension system shall be members of the
County Employees Retirement System. All active members of the local policemen's
pension system at the time of transition to the County Employees Retirement
System may choose membership in the County Employees Retirement System or
may retain membership in the local system. The city shall elect the alternate
participation plan, pursuant to KRS 78.530(3), for policemen who transfer to the
County Employees Retirement System. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS
78.530(3)(b), the city may, at its option, extend the payment period for the cost of
alternate participation to a maximum of twenty (20) years with the interest at the
rate actuarially assumed by the board. The city shall have the right to use assets in
the local pension fund, other than assets necessary to pay benefits to the remaining
active members of the local policemen's pension system and to retirees and their
survivors as determined by actuarial valuation, to assist in the payment of the
annual installment cost of alternate participation. All policemen who become
members of the County Employees Retirement System pursuant to this section shall
be granted hazardous duty coverage, and the city may, at its option, purchase
accumulated sick leave for each policeman upon retirement pursuant to KRS
78.616.
(8) The legislative body in a city of the first class may issue the appropriate order,
Page 42 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
pursuant to KRS 78.530(1), directing participation for firefighters in the County
Employees Retirement System. In the event that the legislative body in a city of the
first class issues such an order, then all new employees who would have been
granted membership in the local firefighters' pension system shall be members of
the County Employees Retirement System. All active members of the local
firefighters' pension system at the time of transition to the County Employees
Retirement System may choose membership in the County Employees Retirement
System or may retain membership in the local system. The city shall elect the
alternate participation plan, pursuant to KRS 78.530(3), for firefighters who transfer
to the County Employees Retirement System. Notwithstanding the provisions of
KRS 78.530(3)(b), the city may, at its option, extend the payment period for the
cost of alternate participation to a maximum of twenty (20) years with the interest at
the rate actuarially assumed by the board. The city shall have the right to use assets
in the local firefighters' pension fund, other than assets necessary to pay benefits to
the remaining active members of the local firefighters' pension system and to
retirees and their survivors as determined by actuarial valuation, to assist in the
payment of the annual installment cost of alternate participation. After certification
by the County Employees Retirement System of eligibility for hazardous duty
coverage, each firefighter who becomes a member of the County Employees
Retirement System pursuant to this section shall be granted hazardous duty
coverage.
(9) [Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 61.702 and 78.635, which relate to the
contributions required of participating employers, any city of the first class
participating in the County Employees Retirement System hazardous duty pension
plan which has in effect a collective bargaining agreement with a group of
employees who participate in said plan, shall have the right to enter into agreement
with its employees or with their respective collective bargaining representatives.
Page 43 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
This agreement may include but is not limited to specifications of what portion of
the required employer contribution shall be borne by the participating employer and
what portion shall be borne by the participating employee. This provision in no way
modifies the employer's obligation to remit the contributions required by the
County Employees Retirement System pursuant to KRS 61.702 and 78.635,
whether such contributions are borne by the city or by its participating employees.
(10) ]With regard to the employer participation or employer contributions pursuant to
KRS 61.702 and 78.635 as it relates to future pension contribution requirements or
as it relates to payback period or interest charge for service liability cost under
alternate participation, if any statute or any resolution of the appropriate state board
of trustees having authority over employer participation or employer contribution
grants any terms or conditions to any city of the home rule class, or to any county,
or to any urban-county government, which are more favorable in terms of
participation than terms or conditions granted to any city of the first class, then said
provisions for employer participation or contribution shall be available to the city of
the first class, at its option and effective upon adoption by the city of the first class
and notification to the County Employees Retirement System.
Section 13. KRS 95.500 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief of the fire department in cities or urban-county governments, or an officer
acting under his or her authority:
(a) Shall be present at all fires and investigate their cause;
(b) May examine witnesses, compel the production of testimony, administer
oaths, make arrests, and enter any building for the purpose of examination
that, in his or her opinion, is in danger from fires; and
(c) Shall report his or her proceedings to the city legislative body when required.
(2) The chief shall:
(a) Direct and control the operations of the members of the fire department in the
Page 44 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
discharge of their duties;
(b) Have access to and use of all cisterns, fireplugs, the waters of the waterworks,
and the cisterns of private persons, for the purpose of extinguishing fires;
(c) Have the right to examine all cisterns, and all plugs and pipes of the
waterworks, to see that they are in condition for use in case of fire;
(d) Have control of all buildings, hose, engines, and other equipment provided for
the fire department; and
(e) Perform such other duties as the legislative body shall, by ordinance,
prescribe.
(3) (a) The fire department of each city listed on the registry pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section or urban-county government shall be divided into three (3)
platoons of firefighters. Each platoon, excluding the chief, the assistant chief,
clerical employees, maintenance employees, fire inspectors, fire investigators,
and arson investigators, in fire departments in the cities listed on the registry
or in urban-county governments, shall be on duty for:
1. Twenty-four (24) consecutive hours, after which the platoon serving
twenty-four (24) hours shall be allowed to remain off duty for forty-
eight (48) consecutive hours;
2. [Unless otherwise provided in a collective bargaining agreement, ]Be on
forty-eight (48) consecutive hours, after which the platoon serving forty-
eight (48) consecutive hours shall be allowed to remain off duty for the
following ninety-six (96) consecutive hours; or
3. [Unless otherwise provided in a collective bargaining agreement,
]Twenty-four (24) hours, after which the platoon serving twenty-four
(24) hours shall be allowed to remain off duty for seventy-two (72)
hours, after which that platoon shall be on duty again for forty-eight (48)
hours, then shall be allowed to remain off duty again for seventy-two
Page 45 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(72) hours;
except in cases of dire emergency. The chief of the fire department shall
arrange the schedule of working hours to comply with the provisions of this
section. The pay, rank, or benefits of the members and officers of the fire
department shall not be reduced as a result of this subsection.
(b) [Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, any city or urban-county
government that maintains a collective bargaining agreement with members
of its fire department may reach an agreement with the bargaining unit to
establish an alternative staffing and scheduling plan for the operation of its
fire department.
(c) ]Any change in a work schedule made pursuant to this subsection shall not
result in a decrease in the compensation of firefighters, exclusive of
unscheduled overtime.
(4) In each city or urban-county government listed on the registry, all employees of the
fire department shall be given not less than two (2) weeks leave of absence
annually, with full pay.
(5) On or before January 1, 2015, the Department for Local Government shall create a
registry of cities that shall be required to comply with the provisions of subsections
(3) and (4) of this section. The Department for Local Government shall include
each of those cities on the registry that were classified as cities of the second class
on August 1, 2014. The Department for Local Government shall make the
information included on the registry available to the public by publishing it on its
website.
Section 14. KRS 96A.200 is amended to read as follows:
If an authority acquires an existing transit system, the authority shall assume and observe
all existing labor contracts and pension obligations. All employees of such system who
are necessary for the operation thereof by the authority shall be transferred to and
Page 46 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
appointed as employees of the authority. Such employees shall be given seniority credit
and sick leave, vacation, insurance, and pension credits in accordance with the records or
labor agreements from the acquired transit system. The authority shall assume the
obligations of any transit system acquired by it with regard to wages, salaries, hours,
working conditions, sick leave, health and welfare and pension or retirement provisions
for employees. The authority and the employees[, through their representatives for
collective bargaining purposes,] shall take whatever action may be necessary to have
pension trust funds presently under the joint control of the acquired transportation system
and the participating employees through their representatives transferred to the trust fund
to be established, maintained and administered jointly by the authority and the
participating employees through their representatives. No employee of any acquired
transportation system who is transferred to a position with the authority shall by reason of
such transfer be placed in any worse position with respect to workers' compensation,
pension, seniority, wages, sick leave, vacation, health and welfare insurance or any other
benefits than he enjoyed as an employee of such acquired transportation system.
Section 15. KRS 160.1599 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An existing public school not scheduled for closure may be converted into a public
charter school and be identified to become a conversion public charter school if an
applicant indicates to a valid authorizer the intent to convert an existing public
school into a conversion public charter school.
(2) A conversion public charter school may only be established if:
(a) A school has been identified by the Kentucky Department of Education as
performing in the lowest five percent (5%) of its level and sixty percent (60%)
of the parents or guardians of students who attend the school have signed a
petition requesting the conversion, which shall be completed and submitted to
a valid authorizer no later than ninety (90) days after the date of the first
signature;
Page 47 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(b) A school has been identified by the Kentucky Department of Education as not
performing in the lowest five percent (5%) of its level and sixty percent (60%)
of the parents or guardians of students who attend the school have signed a
petition requesting the conversion, which is approved by a majority vote of
the local school board. If approved the completed petition shall be submitted
to a valid authorizer no later than ninety (90) days after the date of the first
signature; or
(c) The local school board votes to convert an existing public school over which
it has authority.
(3) For each conversion option identified in subsection (2) of this section, the Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to govern the
processes and procedures for the petition, the conversion, and the operation of a
conversion public charter school.
(4) A conversion public charter school shall be governed by a board of directors
constituted and empowered as provided in KRS 160.1592.
(5) A conversion public charter school shall continue to comply with all federal and
state requirements concerning the treatment of children with special needs and
accept all students who attended the school prior to its conversion who wish to
attend.
(6) A conversion public charter school shall hire its own employees.
(7) An employee who works in a conversion public charter school shall be an employee
of the public charter school.
(8) [(a) For any collective bargaining agreement entered into on or after June 29,
2017, a governing board shall not be bound by its collective bargaining
agreement for employees of a conversion public charter school.
(b) Employees of a conversion public charter school may organize and
collectively bargain only as a unit separate from other school employees.
Page 48 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(9) ]A conversion public charter school shall continue to be housed in the same public
school facility and shall have the option of using the existing assets of the school.
Section 16. KRS 161.141 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "education service provider," "public charter school," "local
school board," and "local school district" have the same meanings as in KRS
160.1590.
(2) (a) Public charter school employees shall participate in the Teachers' Retirement
System or the County Employees Retirement System, as determined by their
eligibility for participation in the appropriate system and provided the public
charter school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to
participate in a governmental retirement plan.
(b) Teachers and other certified personnel shall make any required employee
contributions to the Teachers' Retirement System under KRS 161.220 to
161.716.
(c) Classified employees shall make any required employee contributions to the
County Employees Retirement System under KRS 78.510 to 78.852.
(d) A public charter school shall participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program on the same basis as a local school district pursuant to
KRS 18A.225.
(e) Any state appropriation for retirement, health, or life insurance benefits made
on behalf of a local public employee or a school district employee shall also
be made on behalf of a public charter school employee.
(f) A public charter school shall make any required employer contributions to the
Teachers' Retirement System under KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and the County
Employees Retirement System under KRS 78.510 to 78.852 in the same
manner as local school districts.
(g) For the purposes of calculating sick leave credit under KRS 161.220 to
Page 49 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
161.716, teachers and other certified personnel of a public charter school shall
not accumulate more days of sick leave during their employment with the
public charter school than they would have otherwise accumulated as a
certified employee of the school district of location.
(3) [(a) A public charter school employee shall not be required to be a member of any
collective bargaining agreement.
(b) A public charter school employee who enters into any collective bargaining
unit must do so as a separate unit from the local school district.
(4) ]A local school board shall not require any employee of the local school district to
be employed in a public charter school or any student enrolled in the school district
to attend a public charter school.
(4)[(5)] A local school board shall not harass, threaten, discipline, discharge, retaliate,
or in any manner discriminate against any district employee involved directly or
indirectly with an application to establish a public charter school.
(5)[(6)] An employee of an education service provider shall not be considered a public
charter school employee, but shall meet the same certification and background
check requirements otherwise required of a public charter school employee.
Section 17. KRS 304.48-250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the assets of a liability self-insurance group are at any time insufficient to enable
the group to discharge its legal liabilities, other obligations, and to maintain the
required reserves under this subtitle, the group shall immediately levy an
assessment upon its members for the amount necessary to make up the deficiency.
(2) If there is a deficiency in any fund year, the deficiency shall be made up
immediately, from the following:
(a) Surplus from a fund year other than the current fund year after prior notice of
the transfer has been given to the commissioner;
(b) Administrative funds;
Page 50 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(c) Assessment of membership; or
(d) Alternate methods as the commissioner may direct or approve.
(3) If a liability self-insurance group fails to assess its members within thirty (30) days
to make up a deficit, the commissioner shall order it to do so. This subsection shall
not apply to liability self-insurance groups formed by governmental entities which
do not have joint and several liability.
(4) If a liability self-insurance group fails to make the required assessment of its
members within thirty (30) days after the commissioner orders it to do so, or if the
deficiency is not fully made up within sixty (60) days after the date on which the
assessment is made, or within a longer period of time as may be permitted by the
commissioner, the group shall be determined to be insolvent and may be placed in
delinquency proceedings as an insurer pursuant to Subtitle 33 of this chapter.
(5) (a) Governmental entities that:
1. Participate or have participated in a liability self-insurance group
authorized by this subtitle; and
2. Are assessed by the liability self-insurance group to cover an accrued
deficit;
may finance the payment of the assessment over a period not to exceed twenty
(20) years.
(b) Financing obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
accomplished by:
1. The issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations; or
2. A lease, installment payment agreement, or other similar agreement.
(c) If the governmental entity fails to make a scheduled payment on the financing
obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, any payments due to
that governmental entity shall be withheld or intercepted using the process
established in KRS 160.160(7)[(6)].
Page 51 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(6) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes applying to any financing obtained by a governmental
entity shall apply.
Section 18. KRS 304.50-055 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" or
"NRSRO" means a credit rating agency approved by the United States Securities
and Exchange Commission to provide assessments of the creditworthiness of
financial instruments.
(2) A workers' compensation self-insured group shall establish plans for premium
payment, determination and collection of assessments, and for declaration and
payment of dividends or other disbursements, which shall be filed for prior
approval with the commissioner. Any change in the plans for premium payment,
assessments, or dividends shall be filed for prior approval with the commissioner.
Approval of plans for assessments and dividends does not constitute approval of
any particular assessment or dividend by the commissioner.
(3) Prior to the inception of each group member's self-insurance year, the trustees shall
collect from that member at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated
premium for the ensuing year, except that in the case of a self-insured group formed
by governmental entities twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated premium for
the ensuing year shall be collected no later than thirty (30) days after the beginning
of the self-insured group's self-insurance year. The balance of the estimated
premium shall be collected in either quarterly or monthly installments as set forth in
the enabling documents described in KRS 304.50-030(2)(b) or 304.50-060(2)(b).
Each group member's payroll shall be audited annually and an adjustment to
premium shall be made accordingly.
(4) A disbursement from a workers' compensation self-insured group fund shall be for
a purpose related to the self-insured group. A dividend shall not be approved or
Page 52 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
paid until at least thirty-six (36) months after the expiration of the self-insurance
year and shall be paid from surplus funds not required for payment of claims or
other liabilities. The dividends shall be paid or credited to members according to the
reasonable classifications the trustees may establish. A dividend shall not be paid
which unfairly discriminates between members of the same classifications. A
dividend plan shall specify whether past group members are eligible for the
dividend. Payment of a dividend under a dividend plan shall not be made unless the
self-insured group has notified the commissioner of its intent to make a dividend
payment at least thirty (30) days prior to the payment, and the commissioner has not
disapproved the payment within that time.
(5) The formula to be used for collection of assessments shall be determined by the
trustees and approved by the commissioner. Assessments shall be fair and equitable
and shall not unfairly discriminate between members of the same classification.
(6) A trustee, fiscal agent, or service organization shall not utilize an asset of the self-
insured group for a purpose unrelated to workers' compensation. The trustees shall
maintain cash or cash equivalent accounts as may be prudently necessary to pay
expenses without having to liquidate long-term investments.
(7) The trustees may invest funds in:
(a) United States Government bonds, United States Treasury notes, Treasury
bills, or other direct obligations guaranteed by the full faith and credit of the
United States Government or its agencies;
(b) Tax exempt and taxable obligations issued by any state or any of its agencies,
counties, cities, municipalities, districts, political subdivisions, or other legal
authorities within the United States of America with a minimum rating of
"BBB" by any NRSRO, except that no less than fifty percent (50%) of the
investments made under this paragraph shall be in obligations issued by the
Commonwealth, its agencies, or a county, city district, municipality, political
Page 53 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
subdivision, or other legal authority within the Commonwealth;
(c) Investment share accounts in a savings and loan association in the
Commonwealth whose deposits are insured by a federal agency;
(d) Certificates of deposit if issued by a duly chartered commercial bank;
(e) 1. At the time of purchase, equity securities actively traded on the New
York or NASDAQ Stock Exchanges or other registered national
securities exchanges with no individual equity holding comprising
greater than ten percent (10%) of the equity portion of the portfolio
reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial
condition on file with the commissioner.
2. An investment in an individual equity holding shall not represent at the
time of purchase more than five percent (5%) of the total market value
of the security.
3. At the time of purchase, investments in equity securities shall not exceed
twenty percent (20%) of the total market value of the investment
portfolio of the self-insured group reflected on the most recent quarterly
or annual statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner;
(f) Corporate bonds if:
1. The bond is issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution
created or existing under the laws of the United States, or a state,
province, district, or territory;
2. At the time of purchase, the corporate bond investments do not exceed
twenty-five percent (25%) of the total market value of the investment
portfolio reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual statement of
financial condition on file with the commissioner; and
3. The bond has a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO;
(g) At the time of purchase, mutual funds and exchange traded funds if the
Page 54 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
investments do not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total market value of
the investment portfolio reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual
statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner; and
(h) Asset-backed securities if:
1. The bond is issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution
created or existing under the laws of the United States, or a state,
province, district, or territory;
2. The asset-backed security investments do not exceed ten percent (10%)
of the total market value of the investment portfolio reflected on the
most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial condition on file
with the commissioner; and
3. The bond has a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO.
(8) Of the aggregate investments made by the trustees of the self-insured group under
this section:
(a) Not less than fifty percent (50%) of the total market value of the entire
investment portfolio shall be held in cash, cash equivalents, or securities as
described in subsection (7)(a) to (d) of this section; and
(b) A minimum of five percent (5%) of the total investment portfolio value shall
be maintained in cash or cash equivalent accounts or United States Treasury
and Federal Agency Securities with a remaining maturity of one (1) year or
less.
(9) In the event that any security investment authorized by subsection (7) of this section
is downgraded below "BBB," the workers' compensation self-insurance group shall
divest itself of that investment as prudently as possible without incurring
unnecessary losses.
(10) The commissioner may permit variation from the requirements of this section for
good cause.
Page 55 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(11) (a) Governmental entities that:
1. Participate or have participated in a workers' compensation self-insured
group authorized by this subtitle; and
2. Are assessed by the workers' compensation self-insured group to cover
an accrued deficit;
may finance the payment of the assessment over a period not to exceed twenty
(20) years.
(b) Financing obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
accomplished by:
1. The issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations; or
2. A lease, installment payment agreement, or other similar agreement.
(c) If the governmental entity fails to make a scheduled payment on the financing
obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, any payments due to
that governmental entity shall be withheld or intercepted using the process
established in KRS 160.160(7)[(6)].
(12) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, all other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes applying to any financing obtained by a governmental
entity shall apply.
Section 19. KRS 336.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Employees may, free from restraint or coercion by the employers or their agents,
associate collectively for self-organization and designate collectively
representatives of their own choosing to negotiate the terms and conditions of their
employment to effectively promote their own rights and general welfare.
Employees, collectively and individually, may strike, engage in peaceful picketing,
and assemble collectively for peaceful purposes, except that no public employee,
collectively or individually, may engage in a strike or a work stoppage[. Nothing in
this statute and KRS 65.015, 67A.6904, 67C.406, 70.262, 78.470, 78.480, 336.132,
Page 56 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
336.134, 336.180, 336.990, and 345.050 shall be construed as altering, amending,
granting, or removing the rights of public employees to associate collectively for
self-organization and designate collectively representatives of their own choosing to
negotiate the terms and conditions of their employment to effectively promote their
own rights and general welfare].
(2) Neither employers or their agents nor employees or associations, organizations or
groups of employees shall engage or be permitted to engage in unfair or illegal acts
or practices or resort to violence, intimidation, threats or coercion.
(3) (a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section or any provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, no employee shall be required, as a
condition of employment or continuation of employment, to:
1. Become or remain a member of a labor organization;
2. Pay any dues, fees, assessments, or other similar charges of any kind or
amount to a labor organization; or
3. Pay to any charity or other third party, in lieu of these payments, any
amount equivalent to or pro rata portion of dues, fees, assessments, or
other charges required of a labor organization.
(b) As used in this subsection, the term "employee" means any person employed
by or suffered or permitted to work for a public or private employer.
(4) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her representative shall
investigate complaints of violations or threatened violations of subsection (3) of this
section and may initiate enforcement of a criminal penalty by causing a complaint
to be filed with the appropriate local prosecutor and ensure effective enforcement.
(5) Except in instances where violence, personal injury, or damage to property have
occurred and such occurrence is supported by an affidavit setting forth the facts and
circumstances surrounding such incidents, the employees and their agents shall not
be restrained or enjoined from exercising the rights granted them in subsection (1)
Page 57 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
of this section without a hearing first being held, unless the employees or their
agents are engaged in a strike in violation of a "no strike" clause in their labor
contract.
(6) Submission of a false affidavit concerning violence, personal injury, or damage to
property shall constitute a violation of KRS 523.030. In the absence of any such
affidavit alleging violence, personal injury, or damage injunctions shall be issued
only by a Circuit Judge or other justice or judge acting as a Circuit Judge pursuant
to law.
Section 20. KRS 337.285 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No employer shall employ any of his or her employees for a work week longer than
forty (40) hours, unless such employee receives compensation for his or her
employment in excess of forty (40) hours in a work week at a rate of not less than
one and one-half (1-1/2) times the hourly wage rate at which he or she is employed.
(2) This provision shall not apply to the following:
(a) Employees of retail stores engaged in work connected with selling,
purchasing, and distributing merchandise, wares, goods, articles, or
commodities;
(b) Employees of restaurant, hotel, and motel operations;
(c) Employees as defined and exempted from the overtime provision of the Fair
Labor Standards Act in Sections 213(b)(1), 213(b)(6), 213(b)(10), and
213(b)(17) of Title 29, U.S.C.;
(d) Employees whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour residential care
on the employer's premises in a parental role to children who are primarily
dependent, neglected, and abused and who are in the care of private nonprofit
childcaring facilities licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
under KRS 199.640 to 199.670; or
(e) Any individual who is employed by a third-party employer or agency other
Page 58 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
than the family or household using his or her services to provide in-home
companionship services for a sick, convalescing, or elderly person.
(3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "companionship services" means those
services which provide in-home fellowship, care, and protection for a person who,
because of advanced age or physical or mental infirmity, cannot care for his or her
own needs. These services may include household work related to the care of the
aged or infirm person such as meal preparation, bed making, washing of clothes,
and other similar services. They may also include the performance of general
household work, provided that the household work is incidental, i.e., does not
exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total weekly hours worked. The term
"companionship services" does not include services relating to the care and
protection of the aged or infirm which require and are performed by trained
personnel, such as a registered or practical nurse.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section or any other chapter
of the KRS to the contrary, upon written request by a county or city employee or a
Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, made freely and without coercion, pressure, or
suggestion by the employer, and upon a written agreement reached between the
employer and the county or city employee or the Trooper R Class or CVE R Class
before the performance of the work, a county or city employee or a Trooper R Class
or CVE R Class who is authorized to work one (1) or more hours in excess of the
prescribed hours per week may be granted compensatory leave on an hour-for-hour
basis. Upon the written request by a county or city employee or a Trooper R Class
or CVE R Class, made freely and without coercion, pressure, or suggestion by the
employer, and upon a written agreement reached between the employer and the
county or city employee or the Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, before the
performance of the work, a county or city employee or a Trooper R Class or CVE R
Class who is not exempt from the provisions of the Federal Fair Labor Standards
Page 59 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
Act of 1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et seq., may be granted compensatory
time in lieu of overtime pay, at the rate of not less than one and one-half (1-1/2)
hours for each hour the county or city employee or the Trooper R Class or CVE R
Class is authorized to work in excess of forty (40) hours in a work week.
(5) (a) Upon the request of the county or city employee or the Trooper R Class or
CVE R Class, and as provided in subsection (4) of this section, compensatory
time shall be awarded as follows:
1. A county or city employee who provided work in excess of forty (40)
hours in a public safety activity, an emergency response activity, or a
seasonal activity as described in 29 C.F.R. sec. 553.24, may accrue not
more than four hundred eighty (480) hours of compensatory time; or
2. A county or city employee or a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class
engaged in other work in excess of forty (40) hours, may accrue not
more than two hundred forty (240) hours of compensatory time.
(b) A county or city employee or a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class who has
accrued four hundred eighty (480) hours of compensatory time off pursuant to
paragraph (a)1. of this subsection, or two hundred forty (240) hours of
compensatory time off pursuant to paragraph (a)2. of this subsection, shall for
additional overtime hours of work, be paid overtime compensation.
(6) A county or city employee or a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class who has accrued
compensatory time off as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and who
requested the use of compensatory time, shall be permitted by the employer to use
the compensatory time within a reasonable period after making the request if the
use of the compensatory time does not unduly disrupt the operations of the
employer. Mere inconvenience to the employer shall not constitute a sufficient basis
for denial of a county or city employee's request or a Trooper R Class or CVE R
Class request for compensatory time off.
Page 60 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(7) If compensation is paid to a county or city employee or a Trooper R Class or CVE
R Class for accrued compensatory time off, the compensation shall be paid at the
regular rate earned by the county or city employee or the Trooper R Class or CVE
R Class at the time the county or city employee or the Trooper R Class or CVE R
Class receives the payment.
(8) Upon a county or city employee's termination of employment or the termination of
employment of a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, all unused accrued
compensatory time shall be paid at a rate of compensation not less than:
(a) The average regular rate received by the county or city employee or the
Trooper R Class or CVE R Class during the last three (3) years of the
employment of the county or city employee or Trooper R Class or CVE R
Class; or
(b) The final regular rate received by the county or city employee or Trooper R
Class or CVE R Class, whichever is higher.
(9) Compensatory time shall not be used as a means to avoid statutory overtime
compensation. A county or city employee or a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class
shall have the right to use compensatory time earned and shall not be coerced to
accept more compensatory time than an employer can realistically and in good faith
expect to be able to grant within a reasonable period upon the county or city
employee or the Trooper R Class or CVE R Class making the request for
compensatory time off.
(10) [Nothing in subsections (4) to (9) of this section shall be construed to supersede any
collective bargaining agreement, memorandum of understanding, or any other
agreement between the employer and representative of the county or city employees
or the Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
(11) ]As used in subsections (4) to (9) of this section:
(a) "County or city employee" means an employee of any county, city, charter
Page 61 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or urban-
county government, including an employee of a county or city elected official;
(b) "CVE R Class" has the same meaning as in KRS 16.010; and
(c) "Trooper R Class" has the same meaning as in KRS 16.010.
(11)[(12)] In addition to the designation of a work week under subsection (1) of this
section, local governments, as defined in KRS 95A.210(5), may designate a work
period for professional firefighter employees as defined in KRS 95A.210. The
designated work period shall be not less than one (1) work week of seven (7)
consecutive days and not more than four (4) work weeks of twenty-eight (28)
consecutive days for purposes of complying with the requirements of the Federal
Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et seq. This
subsection shall not exempt local governments from complying with the overtime
requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section and is intended to:
(a) Clarify the option to designate both a work week for compliance with
Kentucky law and a work period for compliance with the Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et seq.; and
(b) Allow for the application of the partial exemption set forth in 29 U.S.C. sec.
207(k) in determining overtime pay under the Fair Labor Standards Act of
1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et seq., only.
(12)[(13)] (a) A law enforcement department of a consolidated local government
organized under KRS Chapter 67C, a city of the home rule class, or a sheriff's
office or county police force, shall not be deemed to have violated subsection
(1) of this section with respect to the employment of a peace officer if:
1. The officer works eighty (80) hours or less in a work period of fourteen
(14) consecutive days; and
2. a. For a law enforcement department of a consolidated local
government[ operating under KRS 67C.408 and organized under
Page 62 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
KRS Chapter 67C], the law enforcement department and any other
entity working with the law enforcement department that includes
the officer agree to the exception;
b. For a law enforcement department of a city of the home rule class,
the law enforcement department and any other entity working with
the law enforcement department agree to the exception. If there is
no other entity working with the law enforcement department or
the officer in a city of the home rule class, only the requirement in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be met;
c. For a sheriff's office[ operating under KRS 70.262, the sheriff's
office and any other entity working with the sheriff's office agree
to the exception. If the sheriff's office does not operate under KRS
70.262], only the requirement in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph
shall be met; or
d. For a county police force[ operating under KRS 67A.6902, the
county police force and any other entity working with the county
police force agree to the exception. If the county police force does
not operate under KRS 67A.6902], only the requirement in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be met.
(b) It is the intent of this subsection to allow the employment of a peace officer
for longer than forty (40) hours in any seven (7) consecutive days within a
fourteen (14) day work period without incurring the obligation to pay a rate of
not less than one and one-half (1-1/2) times the officer's hourly wage under
subsection (1) of this section.
Section 21. KRS 336.180 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made
Page 63 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
expenditures, has appointed a campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent
for any other person to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to
bringing about his or her nomination or election to public office, except federal
office;
(2) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more
specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any
state, county, city, or district office, but does not include an entity established
solely by a candidate which is managed solely by a candidate and a campaign
treasurer and whose name is generic in nature, such as "Friends of (the
candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons have structured themselves
as a committee, designated officers of the committee, and assigned
responsibilities and duties to each officer with the purpose of managing a
campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an election;
(b) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of any caucus groups
who receive contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1)
or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election
to any state, county, city, or district office, or a committee in Kentucky or in
any other state. Caucus campaign committees include but are not limited to:
1. The House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. The House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. The Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. The Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; and
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party,
which serve the same function as the above-named committees, as
determined by administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky
Page 64 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
Registry of Election Finance;
(c) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining
together to advocate or oppose a constitutional amendment or ballot measure
if that committee receives or expends money in excess of one thousand dollars
($1,000);
(d) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an
association, committee, or organization, other than a campaign committee,
political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign committee,
or a party executive committee, which is established as, or intended to be, a
permanent organization having as a primary purpose expressly advocating the
election or defeat of one (1) or more clearly identified candidates, slates of
candidates, or political parties, which functions on a regular basis throughout
the year;
(e) An executive committee of a political party; and
(f) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures in support of inauguration activities for
any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any state, county, city, or
district office;
(3) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates,
slates of candidates, campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or
executive committees from time to time from funds derived solely from within the
group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the group
itself;
(4) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value,
to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a
committee, or contributing organization but shall not include a loan of money
Page 65 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky made in accordance
with applicable banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary course of
business. As used in this subsection, "loan" shall include a guarantee,
endorsement, or other form of security where the risk of nonpayment rests
with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as with a committee,
contributing organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or other primary
obligor. No person shall become liable as surety, endorser, or guarantor for
any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all other
contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of
candidates, its agent, a committee, or a contributing organization, exceeds the
contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized
treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or a
contributing organization, of compensation for the personal services of
another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates,
committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars
($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for
inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate
normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer,
a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing
organization for any goods or services with a value of more than one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for
inauguration activities;
Page 66 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
(5) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election. Each primary, regular,
or special election shall be considered a separate election;
(6) "Electioneering communications" means:
(a) Any communication broadcast by television or radio, printed in a newspaper
or on a billboard, directly mailed or delivered by hand to personal residences,
or in telephone calls made to personal residences, or otherwise distributed
that:
1. Unambiguously refers to any candidate for any state, county, city, or
district office, or to any ballot measure;
2. Is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, made, or distributed within
thirty (30) days before a primary election or sixty (60) days before a
general election; and
3. Is broadcast to, printed in a newspaper, distributed to, mailed to or
delivered by hand to, in telephone calls made to, or otherwise distributed
to an audience that includes members of the electorate for such public
office or the electorate associated with the ballot containing the ballot
measure.
(b) "Electioneering communications" does not include:
1. Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinions or commentary,
writings, or letters to the editor printed in a newspaper, magazine, or
other periodical not owned by or controlled by a candidate, committee,
or political party;
2. Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast facility not
owned or controlled by a candidate, committee, or political party;
3. Any communication by persons made in the regular course and scope of
their business or any communication made by a membership
organization solely to members of such an organization and their
Page 67 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
families;
4. Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of the
popular name of a bill or statute; or
5. A communication that constitutes a contribution or independent
expenditure as defined in this section;
(7) "Employer" means all persons, firms, associations, corporations, public employers,
public school employers, and public colleges, universities, institutions, and
education agencies;
(8) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on
behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office, or an
office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess of two hundred thousand
(200,000) residents;
(9) "Independent expenditure" means the expenditure of money or other things of value
for a communication which expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly
identified candidate or slate of candidates, and which is made without any
coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any candidate, slate of candidates,
campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them, and
which is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate,
slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf
of any of them;
(10) "Labor organization" means any organization of any kind, or any agency or
employee representation committee, association or union which exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning wages, rates of
pay, hours of employment or conditions of work, or other forms of compensation.
Except, for the purposes of this section or KRS 161.158, 164.365, 336.133,
336.134,[ 336.1341,] 336.135, or 336.990, "labor organization" shall not include
organizations which primarily represent public employees working in the protective
Page 68 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
vocations of active law enforcement officer, jail and corrections officer, or active
fire suppression or prevention personnel;
(11) "Political activities" means any contribution or independent expenditure made:
(a) To any committee;
(b) To any contributing organization;
(c) To any candidate;
(d) To any slate of candidates;
(e) To any fundraiser;
(f) For any electioneering communications;
(g) For any testimonial affair;
(h) In any manner intended to influence the outcome of any election;
(i) In any manner intended to otherwise promote or support the defeat of any:
1. Candidate;
2. Slate of candidates; or
3. Ballot measure; or
(j) In any manner intended to advance any position held by any person or entity
other than the public employee regarding any:
1. Election;
2. Candidate;
3. Slate of candidates; or
4. Ballot measure;
(12) "Public employee" means an employee of a "public agency" as that term is defined
in KRS 61.870;
(13) "Slate of candidates" means:
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a
candidate for the office of Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the
candidate designates a running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor
Page 69 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the
office of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that
same slate of candidates consists of that same candidate for the office of
Governor and the candidate's running mate for the office of Lieutenant
Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates; and
(14) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is
or was a candidate for nomination or election to a state, city, county, or district
political office designed to raise funds for the purpose of influencing the outcome
of an election, otherwise promoting support for, or the defeat of, any candidate,
slate of candidates, or ballot measure.
Section 22. KRS 336.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon proof that any person employed by the Education and Labor Cabinet as a
labor inspector has taken any part in any strike, lockout or similar labor dispute, the
person shall forfeit his or her office.
(2) The following civil penalties shall be imposed, in accordance with the provisions in
KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Any person who violates KRS 336.110 or 336.130 shall for each offense be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(b) Any corporation, association, organization, or person that violates KRS
336.190 and 336.200 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
offense. Each act of violation, and each day during which such an agreement
remains in effect, shall constitute a separate offense;
(c) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 336.220 shall be assessed a
Page 70 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation; and
(d) Any labor organization who violates KRS 336.135 shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(e) Any public employer or labor organization that violates KRS 161.158,
164.365, 336.133, 336.134,[ 336.1341,] 336.135, or 336.180 shall be assessed
a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(3) Any labor organization, employer, or other person who directly or indirectly
violates KRS 336.130(3) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Any person aggrieved as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) may seek abatement of the violation or threatened violation by
petitioning a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief and shall be
entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she prevails in the action.
(5) Any person injured as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) may recover all damages resulting from the violation or threatened
violation and shall be entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she
prevails in the action.
Section 23. The following KRS sections are repealed:
67A.6901 Definitions for KRS 67A.6901 to 67A.6911.
67A.6902 Employees' right to organize for the purpose of collective bargaining.
67A.6903 Duty to bargain collectively.
67A.6904 Activities prohibited and duty to bargain in good faith.
67A.6905 Election of exclusive representative.
67A.6906 Unfair labor practices and remedies therefor -- Hearing -- Findings --
Expenses.
Page 71 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
67A.6907 Petition for fact-finding panel upon deadlock -- Hearings -- Findings --
Expenses.
67A.6908 Requirements for an agreement -- Enforcement in Circuit Court.
67A.6909 Urban-county government to withhold dues and deliver to bargaining unit.
67A.6910 Police officers, firefighter personnel, firefighters, corrections personnel, and
labor organizations not to participate in strike.
67A.6911 Volunteer firefighters exempted from provisions of KRS 67A.6901 to
67A.6911.
67C.400 Definitions for KRS 67C.400 to 67C.418.
67C.402 Employees' right to organize for the purpose of collective bargaining -- Mayor
to represent consolidated local government.
67C.404 Duty to bargain collectively.
67C.406 Activities prohibited and duty to bargain in good faith.
67C.408 Election of exclusive representative.
67C.410 Unfair labor practices and remedies therefor -- Hearing -- Final order -- Appeal
to Circuit Court.
67C.412 Petition for fact-finding panel upon deadlock -- Hearings -- Findings --
Expenses.
67C.414 Requirements for an agreement -- Enforcement in Circuit Court.
67C.416 Consolidated local government to withhold dues and deliver to bargaining unit.
67C.418 Police officer or labor organization not to participate in strike.
70.262 Collective bargaining for deputy sheriffs in merit system in county containing a
consolidated local government or a city of first class -- Prohibition against strikes --
Employment contract with sheriff.
78.470 Collective bargaining authorized -- Strikes prohibited.
336.1341 Exemption for joint wage agreement or collective bargaining contract entered
into prior to March 29, 2023.
Page 72 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2426
345.010 Definitions for chapter.
345.020 Policy and purpose.
345.030 Employees' right to organize for the purpose of collective bargaining.
345.040 Duty to bargain collectively.
345.050 Activities prohibited and duty to bargain in good faith.
345.060 Election of exclusive representative.
345.070 Unfair labor practices and remedies therefor -- Hearing -- Final order --Appeal
to Circuit Court.
345.080 Petition for fact-finding panel upon deadlock -- Hearings -- Findings --
Expenses -- Rules.
345.090 Representative of the public employer.
345.100 Requirements for an agreement -- Enforcement in Circuit Court.
345.110 Public employer to withhold dues and deliver to bargaining unit.
345.120 State Labor Relations Board.
345.130 Firefighter or labor organization not to participate in strike.
Section 24. This Act may be cited as the Taxpayer Protection Act.
Section 25. Whereas the protection of public funds is of paramount importance
to the citizens of this Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 73 of 73
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:15 PM Jacketed